Massachusetts, session 194th, H1362.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 112 Sections 66 to 73 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting at the end of section 66B the following:
For the purposes of sections 66 to 73, inclusive and any rules or regulations promulgated
pursuant thereto, “invasive surgical procedures” shall be defined as any procedures which
structurally alter the human body by the incision or destruction or cutting of tissues. Invasive
surgical procedures also include the diagnostic or therapeutic treatment of conditions or disease
processes by any instruments causing localized alteration or transposition of live human tissue,
or surgically implanted artificial prosthetics, which include lasers, ultrasound, ionizing radiation,
scalpels, probes, and needles. The tissue can be cut, injected, burned, vaporized, frozen, sutured,
probed, or manipulated by closed reductions for major dislocations or fractures, or otherwise
of 2

altered by mechanical, thermal, light-based, electromagnetic, chemical means, or other means.
Invasive surgical procedures do not include the use of an epinephrine auto-injector to counteract
anaphylaxis.
SECTION 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to restrict, limit or expand the current
scope of practice authorized under Chapter 112 and in effect upon passage of this act, of any
profession licensed under Chapter 112.
of 2